Utah statutes.
78B-3-201.   Title -- Purpose.

(1)  This part is known as the "Nonresident Jurisdiction Act."

(2)  It is declared, as a matter of legislative policy, that the public interest demands the state provide its citizens with an effective means of redress against nonresident persons, who, through certain significant minimal contacts with this state, incur obligations to citizens entitled to the state's protection.  This legislative action is necessary because of technological progress which has substantially increased the flow of commerce between the several states resulting in increased interaction between persons of this state and persons of other states.

(3)  The provisions of this part, to ensure maximum protection to citizens of this state, should be applied so as to assert jurisdiction over nonresident defendants to the fullest extent permitted by the due process clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

